Illinois, session 104th, HB5631.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The sum of $64,534,900, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Department of Central Management Services for 8ordinary and contingent expenses. 9    Section 10. The following named amounts, or so much 10thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 11purposes hereinafter named are appropriated to the Department 12of Central Management Services:13PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND14  For payment of administrative expenses and claims,15   including prior years' claims or administrative expenses,16   under the State Employee Indemnification Act.....2,589,20017  For auto liability, adjusting and18   administration of claims, loss control and prevention19   services, and auto liability claims, including20   prior years' claims..............................2,120,70021  For Awards to Employees and Expenses22   of the Employee Suggestion Board....................30,000  HB5631- 2 -OMB104 00172 JMW 10172 b1  For Wage Claims...................................1,900,0002  For Nurses' Tuition.................................100,0003  For the Upward Mobility Program,4  including prior years' costs......................5,000,0005    Total                                         $11,739,9006PAYABLE FROM PROFESSIONAL SERVICES FUND7  For Professional Services including8   Administrative and Related Costs................90,000,000 9    Section 15. The following named amounts, or so much 10thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 11purposes hereinafter named are appropriated to the Department 12of Central Management Services:13BUREAU OF BENEFITS14PAYABLE FROM WORKERS' COMPENSATION REVOLVING FUND15  For administrative costs and claims 16   of any state agency or university17   employee.......................................140,000,000 18   Expenditures from appropriations for treatment and expense 19may be made after the Department of Central Management 20Services has certified that the injured person was employed 21and that the nature of the injury is compensable in accordance 22with the provisions of the Workers' Compensation Act or the 23Workers' Occupational Diseases Act, and then has determined 24the amount of such compensation to be paid to the injured   HB5631- 3 -OMB104 00172 JMW 10172 b1person.2PAYABLE FROM STATE EMPLOYEES DEFERRED3COMPENSATION PLAN FUND4  For expenses related to the administration5   of the State Employees' Deferred6   Compensation Plan................................1,624,300 7BUREAU OF BENEFITS8PAYABLE FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND9  For transportation and lodging expenses for eligible 10employees, retirees or for their dependents who are required 11to travel outside of their state of residence in order to 12secure reproductive healthcare. Transportation and lodging 13expenses shall be reimbursable to the eligible employee in an 14amount not to exceed $1,000 per occurrence. 15  For administrative costs and claims 16   of any state agency or university 17   employee...........................................250,000 18    Section 20. The following named amounts, or so much 19thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the 20Facilities Management Revolving Fund to the Department of 21Central Management Services for expenses related to the 22following:23PAYABLE FROM FACILITIES MANAGEMENT REVOLVING FUND  HB5631- 4 -OMB104 00172 JMW 10172 b1  For Facilities Management including2   Administrative and Related Costs,3   including prior years' costs...................314,529,6004  For Prompt Payment Interest.........................500,0005    Total                                        $315,029,600 6   The Department, with the consent in writing from the 7Governor, may reapportion not more than one percent of the 8total appropriation of Facility Management Revolving Funds in 9this section among the various purposes herein enumerated. 10    Section 25. The following named amounts, or so much 11thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 12for the objects and purposes hereinafter named to the 13Department of Central Management Services:14BUREAU OF AGENCY SERVICES15PAYABLE FROM STATE GARAGE REVOLVING FUND16  For State Garage including 17   Administrative and Related Costs,18   including prior years' costs....................84,620,700 19    Section 30. The following named amounts, or so much 20thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the specific 21purposes of: (1) purchasing and/or leasing zero emission 22electric passenger motor vehicles; (2) designing and 23purchasing electric vehicle charging infrastructure and   HB5631- 5 -OMB104 00172 JMW 10172 b1associated improvements; (3) purchasing batteries, components, 2diagnostic tools and equipment to maintain and repair zero 3emission electric vehicles; (4) providing supplemental 4training for employees to maintain and repair zero emission 5electric vehicles and electric vehicle charging 6infrastructures; and (5) procuring any goods or services 7related to converting the state government fleet to zero 8emission vehicles are appropriated to the Department of 9Central Management Services:10PAYABLE FROM STATE GARAGE REVOLVING FUND11  For all costs associated with converting the12   state government vehicle fleet to13   zero emission electric vehicles, 14   including prior years' costs....................24,800,000 15    Section 35. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, is appropriated from the Energy Transition 17Assistance Fund to the Department of Central Management 18Services for operational expenses and administration of the 19Energy Transition Act including state fleet electrification. 20    Section 40. The sum of $17,500,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Facility 22Repair and Maintenance Fund to the Department of Central 23Management Services for repairs, maintenance, and other 24permanent improvements.   HB5631- 6 -OMB104 00172 JMW 10172 b1    Section 45. No contract shall be entered into or 2obligation incurred or any expenditure made from any 3appropriation herein made in Section 40 of this Article until 4after the purpose and amounts have been approved in writing by 5the Governor. 6ARTICLE 27    Section 5. The sum of $2,799,099,900, or so much thereof 8as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 9Fund to the Department of Central Management Services for 10Group Insurance. 11    Section 10. The following named amounts, or so much 12thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 13purposes hereinafter named are appropriated to the Department 14of Central Management Services:15PAYABLE FROM ROAD FUND16  For Group Insurance.............................155,465,20017PAYABLE FROM GROUP INSURANCE PREMIUM FUND18  For Life Insurance Coverage as Elected 19   by Members Per the State Employees 20   Group Insurance Act of 1971....................122,400,00021PAYABLE FROM HEALTH INSURANCE RESERVE FUND22  For provisions of Health Care Coverage   HB5631- 7 -OMB104 00172 JMW 10172 b1   as Elected by Eligible Members Per 2   the State Employees Group Insurance Act 3   of 1971......................................4,795,000,0004  For Prompt Payment Interest.......................5,000,0005    Total                                      $4,800,000,000 6   The Department, with the consent in writing from the 7Governor, may reapportion not more than one percent of the 8total appropriation of Health Insurance Reserve Funds in this 9section among the various purposes herein enumerated. 10    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112026.